Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4029
Stocks and bonds.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise
provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with
respect to stocks and bonds authorizes the agent to:

(1) Buy, sell, and exchange
stocks and bonds;

(2)
Establish, continue, modify, or terminate an account with respect to stocks
and bonds;

(3)
Pledge stocks and bonds as security to borrow, pay, renew, or extend the time
of payment of a debt of the principal;

(4) Receive certificates and other evidences of ownership
with respect to stocks and bonds; and

(5) Exercise voting rights with respect to stocks
and bonds in person or by proxy, enter into voting trusts, and consent to
limitations on the right to vote.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 29.